Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB29.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 109 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
solid waste management facility that is collecting, storing, transporting, transferring, processing, treating,
or disposing of solid waste that was generated outside of the county or waste management district where the
solid waste management facility is located shall not be subject to any assessment, fee, permitting
requirement, or other authorization requirement imposed by the county or waste management district where
the solid waste was generated.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to consideration or fees mutually agreed to in a franchise
agreement specifically authorized by a county ordinance between a service provider and a county or waste
management district for provision of solid waste collection, storage, transportation, transfer, processing,
treatment, or disposal services.
Section 2. KRS 224.40-315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No permit to construct or expand a municipal solid waste disposal facility shall be accepted for processing by
the cabinet unless the application contains a determination from the governing body for the solid waste
management area in which the facility is or will be located concerning the consistency of the application with
the area solid waste management plan submitted under KRS 224.43-345(1)(a) to (d) and (l) until January 1,
1993, and the entire plan after January 1, 1993. The governing body for the area shall, within sixty (60) days of
receipt of a written request, make the determination after public notice and opportunity for public comment
and public hearing. For applications with a notice of intent filed prior to February 26, 1991, the cabinet shall
continue to process the application but no permit shall be approved until the governing body for the solid
waste management area in which the facility is or will be located has made a determination in accordance with
this section.
(2) No permit to construct or expand a municipal solid waste disposal facility shall be approved unless the
applicant affirmatively demonstrates and the cabinet makes a written finding in the preliminary determination
made pursuant to KRS 224.40-310(2) that the application conforms to and is consistent with all of the
following:
(a) The capacity needs identified in the area solid waste management plan;
(b) Other elements of the area solid waste management plan, for permit applications filed after approval of
those elements;
(c) The statewide solid waste reduction and management plan, for permit applications filed after
completion of the plan; and
(d) Applicable zoning regulations adopted pursuant to KRS Chapter 100.
(3) If the cabinet approves a permit to construct or expand a municipal solid waste management facility after the
governing body for the area has determined the application to be inconsistent with the area solid waste
management plan, as part of the written finding the cabinet shall state in detail the reasons why it did not
accept the determination of the governing body for the area.
(4) (a) For the purposes of this section, the term municipal solid waste disposal facility includes, in addition to
those facilities defined in KRS 224.1-010(14), any residual or contained landfill or incinerator disposing
of industrial solid waste[ for a fee], but does not include a waste site or facility that is owned and[which
is] operated[ exclusively] by a solid waste generator and:
1. Exclusively accepts industrial solid waste generated from industrial activities of that generator
that occur on the same, contiguous, or adjacent property, including where divided by a
roadway, as well as any additional industrial solid waste received from a corporate affiliate or
generated at another facility owned by the generator; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Is an existing permitted waste site or facility located on property owned by the solid waste
generator that:
a. Is not located in the same county as the solid waste generator; and
b. Accepts only[on property owned by the solid waste generator which accepts only]
industrial solid waste from the solid waste generator[ or industrial solid waste generated at
another facility owned and operated by the generator or wholly-owned subsidiary].
(b) Paragraph (a)2. of this subsection shall include permit modifications granting vertical or horizontal
expansions of that permitted waste site or facility on that property, including all contiguous or
abutting tracts owned by that solid waste generator prior to January 1, 2026.
Section 3. Whereas it is critical that changes to allowable fees and definitions applicable to solid waste
management facilities go into effect as soon as possible to give clarity to both local governments and regulated
entities, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or
upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.